California, session 20252026, AB2587.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12532 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:12532. (a) The director shall continuously interpret the results of the pesticide residue monitoring program in order to assess its general effectiveness at preventing public exposure to illegal pesticide residues.(b) The director shall release to the public, on an annual basis, comprehensive summaries of the results of the pesticide residue monitoring program. The director shall disclose information regarding the disposition of products found to contain illegal pesticide residue levels.(c) The director shall identify in his or her the reports the specific county where unprocessed agricultural foods have been discovered to contain illegal pesticide residue levels, the specific commodity, and the county where the commodity was produced.(d) The director shall file copies of all data sheets for over tolerances with the commissioner for the county where the unprocessed agricultural foods have been grown.(e) The director shall include in the reports, in addition to the specific commodity affected, the pesticide identified for each illegal residue found.